Utah statutes.
76-6-204.   Burglary of a vehicle -- Charge of other offense.

(1) Any person who unlawfully enters any vehicle with intent to commit a felony or theft is guilty of a burglary of a vehicle.

(2)  Burglary of a vehicle is a class A misdemeanor.

(3)  A charge against any person for a violation of Subsection (1) shall not preclude a charge for a commission of any other offense.

